Massachusetts, session 194th, H434.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 18C of chapter 58, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is
hereby amended by striking out the section in its entirety and inserting in place thereof the
following:-
Section 18C. (a) In this section, ''budgeted aid'' shall mean unrestricted aid to cities and
towns, payments in lieu of taxes from the commonwealth to cities and towns, and education aid
to cities and towns under chapter 70.
(b) State lottery revenue shall be apportioned to cities and towns proportionate to lottery
sales in those cities and towns.
(c) The state treasurer shall, subject to appropriation but not subject to allotment under
section 9B of chapter 29, distribute budgeted aid to cities and towns. The distribution shall be
made in 12 equal payments, on or before the last day of each month.
of 2

Notwithstanding clause Forty-first of section 7 of chapter 4 or any other general or
special law to the contrary, the commissioner of revenue or any official responsible for a local
reimbursement or assistance program reported by said commissioner under section 25A shall
use, as appropriate, the most recent city and town population estimates of the United States
Bureau of the Census in calculating distributions or assessments under local reimbursement or
assistance programs. Such distribution programs shall include, but not be limited to, the chapter
70 school aid program and aid to regional public libraries. Such assessments shall include, but
not be limited to, air pollution control districts, the metropolitan area planning council, the old
colony planning council, the Massachusetts Bay Transportation Authority, and any other entity
for which said commissioner is required to give notice under said section 25A.
(d) This section shall not be construed to prohibit the distribution of other state
government payments to cities and towns that are not budgeted aid through 1 or more of the
monthly payments to cities and towns. Nor shall this section be construed to prohibit the
deduction from distributions to satisfy amounts owed to the state by cities and towns under
section 20A or any other general or special law.
of 2